Mississippi, session 2026, HB1654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 9-1-36, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-1-36.  (1)  Each circuit judge and chancellor shall receive an office operating allowance for the expenses of operating the office of the judge, including retaining a law clerk, legal research, stenographic help, stationery, stamps, furniture, office equipment, telephone, office rent and other items and expenditures necessary and incident to maintaining the office of judge which may include expenses to travel out of state once per state fiscal year for continuing legal education classes and or seminars if approved by the Chief Justice.  The allowance shall be paid only to the extent of actual expenses incurred by the judge as itemized and certified by the judge to the Supreme Court in the amounts set forth in this subsection; however, the judge may expend sums in excess thereof from the compensation otherwise provided for his office. From and after July 1, 2023, the office operating allowance under this subsection shall be Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) per annum. (2)  In addition to the amounts provided for in subsection (1), there is created a separate office allowance fund for the purpose of providing support staff to judges.  This fund shall be managed by the Administrative Office of Courts. (3)  Each judge who desires to employ support staff must have each candidate approved by the Administrative Office of Courts before the positions may be filled.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall not approve any hire which does not first require the expenditure of the funds in the support staff fund for compensation of any of the support staff before expenditure is authorized of county funds for that purpose.  Upon approval by the Administrative Office of Courts, the judge or judges may appoint the employees to the position or positions, and each employee so appointed will work at the will and pleasure of the judge or judges who appointed him but will be employees of the Administrative Office of Courts.  Upon approval by the Administrative Office of Courts, the appointment of any support staff shall be evidenced by the entry of an order on the minutes of the court.  When support staff is appointed jointly by two (2) or more judges, the order setting forth any appointment shall be entered on the minutes of each participating court. (4)  Support staff shall receive compensation pursuant to personnel policies established by the Administrative Office of Courts.  Each judge shall be allotted the amount of One Hundred Thirty Thousand Dollars ($130,000.00) per fiscal year for all support staff approved by the Administrative Office of Courts. The Administrative Office of Courts may approve expenditures from the fund for additional equipment for support staff appointed pursuant to this section in any year in which the allocation per judge is sufficient to meet the equipment expense after provision for the compensation of the support staff. (5)  For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meaning ascribed in this subsection unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Judges" means circuit judges and chancellors, or any combination thereof. (b)  "Support staff" means court administrators, law clerks, legal research assistants or secretaries, or any combination thereof, but shall not mean school attendance officers. (c) "Compensation" means the gross salary plus all amounts paid for benefits or otherwise as a result of employment or as required by employment; however, only salary earned for services rendered shall be reported and credited for Public Employees' Retirement System purposes.  Amounts paid for benefits or otherwise, including reimbursement for travel expenses, shall not be reported or credited for retirement purposes. (d)  "Law clerk" means a clerk hired to assist a judge or judges who has a law degree or who is a full-time law student who is making satisfactory progress at an accredited law school. (6)  Title to all tangible property, excepting stamps, stationery and minor expendable office supplies, procured with funds authorized by this section, shall be and forever remain in the State of Mississippi to be used by the circuit judge or chancellor during the term of his office and thereafter by his successors. (7)  Any circuit judge or chancellor who did not have a primary office provided by the county on March 1, 1988, shall be allowed an additional Seven Thousand Dollars ($7,000.00) per annum to defray the actual expenses incurred by the judge or chancellor in maintaining an office; however, any circuit judge or chancellor who had a primary office provided by the county on March 1, 1988, and who vacated the office space after that date for a legitimate reason, as determined by the Department of Finance and Administration, shall be allowed the additional office expense allowance provided under this subsection.  The county in which a circuit judge or chancellor sits is authorized to provide funds from any available source to assist in defraying the actual expenses to maintain an office. (8)  The Supreme Court, through the Administrative Office of Courts, shall submit to the Department of Finance and Administration the itemized and certified expenses for office operating allowances that are directed to the court pursuant to this section. (9)  The Supreme Court, through the Administrative Office of Courts, shall have the power to adopt rules and regulations regarding the administration of the office operating allowance authorized pursuant to this section. SECTION 2.  Section 9-21-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 9-21-45.  (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund designated as the Judicial System Operation Fund.  The funds shall be administered by the Supreme Court through the Administrative Office of Courts.  The fund shall consist of monies deposited therein as provided in Section 99-19-72 and monies from any other source designated for deposit into the fund.  The Administrative Office of Courts may also accept monies from any public or private source for deposit into the fund.  Money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned from the investment of monies in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. (2)  Monies in the fund shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature and may only be used for the purpose of the operation of the judicial system in the state as determined necessary by the Supreme Court and to provide additional funds for the judicial salaries set forth in Section 25-3-35 and Section 9-9-11(8).  Monies in the fund used for the purposes described in this section shall be in addition to other funds available from any other source for such purposes. SECTION 3.  Section 25-7-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-7-3.  The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall charge the following fees: (a)  General docket fee, for filing the record on appeal in a civil or criminal case................................... $200.00 (b) Miscellaneous docket fee..................   50.00 (c) Confidential miscellaneous docket fee...... 200.00 (d)  Admission of new attorneys................   30.00 (e)  Act of Congress certificate................   25.00 (f) Certificate of admission replacement.......   25.00 (g) Certificate of good standing replacement...   10.00 (h)  Attest stamp..............................    5.00 (i)  Order from Minute Book....................   10.00 (j)  Regular copying....................... 50 per page (k)  Copying from bound volumes or records........................................... 2.00 per page (l)  Copy of mandate...........................   10.00 (m)  Minimum copy charge.......................    1.00 (n)  Notary fee................................ 2.50 (o)  Decision list charge......................    5.00 (p)  Handling charge and retrieval and delivery charges on completed Supreme Court records (to be retained out of deposit) On-site retrieval.........................   10.00 Off-site retrieval........................   15.00 (q)  Forfeited deposits on completed Supreme Court records 100.00 (r)  Petition for rehearing....................   50.00 Said general docket fee shall be collected from the appellant by the clerk of the lower court and forwarded to the Clerk of the Supreme Court.  The Clerk of the Supreme Court shall charge the maximum amount allowable by law for services rendered where charges for such services are provided by statute; for any other services rendered, the amount charged shall be consistent with the cost of providing such services.  All fees shall be paid in the form of cash, cashier's check, or money order or by a check on the account of an attorney payable to the Clerk of the Supreme Court. All fees authorized to be assessed and collected by the Clerk of the Supreme Court shall be deposited into the State General Fund, except that One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) of the general docket fee set under paragraph (a), Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) of the miscellaneous docket fee set under paragraph (b), One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) of the confidential miscellaneous fee set under paragraph (c), Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) of the act of Congress certificate set under paragraph (e), Ten Dollars ($10.00) of the certificate of admission replacement set under paragraph (f), Two Dollars and Fifty Cents ($2.50) of the attest stamp set under paragraph (h), Five Dollars ($5.00) of the order from minute book set under paragraph (i), Seven Dollars ($7.00) of the copy of mandate set under paragraph (l), Fifty Dollars ($50.00) of the forfeited deposits on completed Supreme Court records set under paragraph (q), Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) of the petition for rehearing fee under paragraph (r), and the total amount charged for any other services rendered shall be deposited to the credit of the Judicial System Operation Fund established in Section 9-21-45. SECTION 4.  Section 25-7-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: [From and after January 1, 2024, and through December 31, 2027, this section shall read as follows:] 25-7-9.  (1)  The clerks of the chancery courts shall charge the following fees: (a)  For the act of certifying copies of filed documents, for each complete document................................ $     1.00 (b)  (i)  Recording each deed, will, lease, amendment, subordination, lien, release, cancellation, order, decree, oath, etc., per book and page listed where applicable, each deed of trust, or any other document, for the first five (5) pages................................................ $ 25.00 (ii)  Each additional page.............. $     1.00 (c)  (i)  Recording oil and gas leases, cancellations, etc., including indexing in general indices; for the first five (5) pages............................................ $ 25.00 (ii)  Recording each oil and gas assignment, amendment of assignment, release, etc., first five (5) pages................................................ $ 25.00 per additional assignee............................... $ 18.00 (iii)  Each additional page............. $     1.00 (iv)  Sectional index entries per section or subdivision lot.................................................. $     1.00 (v)  Archive fee....................... $     1.00 (vi)  Entering marginal notations, if requested on document or by cover letter, pertaining to the recording of any oil and gas document only per book and page................... $     4.00 (d)  (i)  Furnishing copies of any papers of record or on file: If performed by the clerk or his employee, per page............................................. $ .50 If performed by any other person, per page............................................. $ .25 (ii)  Entering marginal notations on documents of record................................... $ 1.00 (e)  For attending the board of supervisors' meeting, an annual sum not exceeding..................................... $ 2,500.00 (f)  For other services as clerk of the board of supervisors an allowance shall be made to him (payable semiannually at the July and January meetings) out of the county treasury, an annual sum not exceeding..................................................... $ 5,500.00 (g)  For each day's attendance on the chancery court, to be approved by the chancellor: For the first chancellor sitting only, clerk and two (2) deputies, each..................................................... $ 85.00 For the second chancellor sitting, clerk only.......... $    85.00 Provided that the fees herein prescribed shall be the total remuneration for the clerk and his deputies for attending chancery court. (h)  On order of the court, clerks and not more than two (2) deputies may be allowed five (5) extra days for each term of court for attendance upon the court to get up records. (i)  For public service not otherwise specifically provided for, the chancery court may by order allow the clerk to be paid by the county on the order of the board of supervisors, an annual sum not exceeding............................................ $ 5,000.00 (j)  For each civil filing, to be deposited into the Civil Legal Assistance Fund................................. $     5.00 The chancery clerk shall itemize on the original document a detailed fee bill of all charges due or paid for filing, recording and abstracting same.  No person shall be required to pay such fees until same have been so itemized, but those fees may be demanded before the document is recorded. (2)  The following fee shall be a total fee for all services performed by the clerk with respect to any civil case filed that includes, but is not limited to, divorce, alteration of birth or marriage certificate, removal of minority, guardianship or conservatorship, estate of deceased, adoption that does not involve the Department of Child Protection Services, land dispute injunction, settlement of small claim, contempt, modification, partition suit, or commitment, which shall be payable upon filing and shall accrue to the chancery clerk at the time of filing.  The clerk or his successor in office shall perform all duties set forth without additional compensation or fee....... $    85.00 (3)  For every civil case filed: (a)  An additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Comprehensive Electronic Court Systems Fund established in Section 9-21-14................................................... $ 10.00 (b)  An additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Judicial System Operation Fund established in Section 9-21-45....................................... $ 40.00 (4)  Cost of process shall be borne by the issuing party.  Additionally, should the attorney or person filing the pleadings desire the clerk to pay the cost to the sheriff for serving process on one (1) person or more, or to pay the cost of publication, the clerk shall demand the actual charges therefor, at the time of filing. (5)  For each civil case filed including an adoption involving the Department of Child Protection Services, the filing shall be exempt from any fee under this section. [From and after January 1, 2028, this section shall read as follows:] 25-7-9.  (1)  The clerks of the chancery courts shall charge the following fees: (a)  For the act of certifying copies of filed documents, for each complete document................................ $     1.00 (b)  (i)  Recording each deed, will, lease, amendment, subordination, lien, release, cancellation, order, decree, oath, etc., per book and page listed where applicable, each deed of trust, or any other document, for the first five (5) pages................................................ $ 25.00 (ii)  Each additional page.............. $     1.00 (c)  (i)  Recording oil and gas leases, cancellations, etc., including indexing in general indices; for the first five (5) pages   $ 25.00 (ii)  Recording each oil and gas assignment, amendment of assignment, release, etc., first five (5) pages................................................ $ 25.00 per additional assignee............................... $ 18.00 (iii)  Each additional page............. $     1.00 (iv)  Sectional index entries per section or subdivision lot.................................................. $     1.00 (v)  Archive fee....................... $     1.00 (vi)  Entering marginal notations, if requested on document or by cover letter, pertaining to the recording of any oil and gas document only per book and page................... $     4.00 (d)  (i)  Furnishing copies of any papers of record or on file: If performed by the clerk or his employee, per page............................................. $ .50 If performed by any other person, per page............................................. $ .25 (ii)  Entering marginal notations on documents of record................................... $ 1.00 (e)  For attending the board of supervisors' meeting an annual sum not exceeding..................................... $ 5,000.00 (f)  For other services as clerk of the board of supervisors an allowance shall be made to him (payable semiannually at the July and January meetings) out of the county treasury, an annual sum not exceeding..................................................... $10,000.00 (g)  For each day's attendance on the chancery court, to be approved by the chancellor: For the first chancellor sitting only, clerk and two (2) deputies, each..................................................... $ 85.00 For the second chancellor sitting, clerk only.......... $    85.00 Provided that the fees herein prescribed shall be the total remuneration for the clerk and his deputies for attending chancery court. (h)  On order of the court, clerks and not more than two (2) deputies may be allowed five (5) extra days for each term of court for attendance upon the court to get up records. (i)  For public service not otherwise specifically provided for, the chancery court may by order allow the clerk to be paid by the county on the order of the board of supervisors, an annual sum not exceeding............................................ $ 5,000.00 (j)  For each civil filing, to be deposited into the Civil Legal Assistance Fund................................. $     5.00 The chancery clerk shall itemize on the original document a detailed fee bill of all charges due or paid for filing, recording and abstracting same.  No person shall be required to pay such fees until same have been so itemized, but those fees may be demanded before the document is recorded. (2)  The following fee shall be a total fee for all services performed by the clerk with respect to any civil case filed that includes, but is not limited to, divorce, alteration of birth or marriage certificate, removal of minority, guardianship or conservatorship, estate of deceased, adoption that does not involve the Department of Child Protection Services, land dispute injunction, settlement of small claim, contempt, modification, partition suit, or commitment, which shall be payable upon filing and shall accrue to the chancery clerk at the time of filing.  The clerk or his successor in office shall perform all duties set forth without additional compensation or fee....... $    85.00 (3)  For every civil case filed: (a)  An additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Comprehensive Electronic Court Systems Fund established in Section 9-21-14................................................... $ 10.00 (b)  An additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Judicial System Operation Fund established in Section 9-21-45....................................... $ 40.00 (4)  Cost of process shall be borne by the issuing party.  Additionally, should the attorney or person filing the pleadings desire the clerk to pay the cost to the sheriff for serving process on one (1) person or more, or to pay the cost of publication, the clerk shall demand the actual charges therefor, at the time of filing. (5)  For each civil case filed including an adoption involving the Department of Child Protection Services, the filing shall be exempt from any fee under this section. SECTION 5.  Section 25-7-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-7-13.  (1)  The clerks of the circuit court shall charge the following fees: (a)  Docketing, filing, marking and registering each complaint, petition and indictment................................ $   85.00 The fee set forth in this paragraph shall be the total fee for all services performed by the clerk up to and including entry of judgment with respect to each complaint, petition or indictment, including all answers, claims, orders, continuances and other papers filed therein, issuing each writ, summons, subpoena or other such instruments, swearing witnesses, taking and recording bonds and pleas, and recording judgments, orders, fiats and certificates; the fee shall be payable upon filing and shall accrue to the clerk at the time of collection.  The clerk or his or her successor in office shall perform all duties set forth above without additional compensation or fee. (b)  Docketing and filing each motion to renew judgment, notice of renewal of judgment, suggestion for a writ of garnishment, suggestion for a writ of execution and judgment debtor actions and issuing all process, filing and recording orders or other papers and swearing witnesses............................................. $ 35.00 (c)  For every civil case filed, an additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Comprehensive Electronic Court Systems Fund established in Section 9-21-14.................... $   10.00 (d)  For every civil case filed, an additional fee to be deposited to the credit of the Judicial System Operation Fund established in Section 9-21-45..................................... $ 40.00 (2)  Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the clerks of the circuit court shall charge the following fees: (a)  Filing and marking each order or other paper and recording and indexing same...................................... $    2.00 (b)  Issuing each writ, summons, subpoena, citation, capias and other such instruments................................. $    1.00 (c)  Administering an oath and taking bond.... $    2.00 (d)  Certifying copies of filed documents, for each complete document.............................................. $    1.00 (e)  Recording orders, fiats, licenses, certificates, oaths and bonds: First page........................................ $ 2.00 Each additional page.............................. $ 1.00 (f)  Furnishing copies of any papers of record or on file and entering marginal notations on documents of record: If performed by the clerk or his or her employee, per page.............................................. $ 1.00 If performed by any other person, per page......... $ .25 (g)  Judgment roll entry..................... $    5.00 (h)  Taxing cost and certificate.............. $    1.00 (i)  For taking and recording application for marriage license, for filing and recording consent of parents when required by law, for filing and recording medical certificate, filing and recording proof of age, recording and issuing license, recording and filing returns $   35.00 The clerk shall deposit Fourteen Dollars ($14.00) of each fee collected for a marriage license in the Victims of Domestic Violence Fund established in Section 93-21-117, on a monthly basis. (j)  For certified copy of marriage license and search of record, the same fee charged by the Bureau of Vital Statistics of the State Board of Health. (k)  For public service not particularly provided for, the circuit court may allow the clerk, per annum, to be paid by the county on presentation of the circuit court's order, the following amount $5,000.00 However, in the counties having two (2) judicial districts, such above allowance shall be made for each judicial district. (l)  For drawing jurors and issuing venire, to be paid by the county................................................ $    5.00 (m)  For each day's attendance upon the circuit court term, for himself or herself and necessary deputies allowed by the court, each to be paid by the county.................................. $   85.00 (n)  Summons, each juror to be paid by the county upon the allowance of the court................................. $    1.00 (o)  For issuing each grand jury subpoena, to be paid by the county on allowance by the court, not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) in any one (1) term of court................................................. $ 1.00 (p)  For each civil filing, to be deposited into the Civil Legal Assistance Fund.................................. $ 5.00 (3)  On order of the court, clerks and deputies may be allowed five (5) extra days for attendance upon the court to get up records. (4)  The clerk's fees in state cases where the state fails in the prosecution, or in cases of felony where the defendant is convicted and the cost cannot be made out of his or her estate, in an amount not to exceed Four Hundred Dollars ($400.00) in one (1) year, shall be paid out of the county treasury on approval of the circuit court, and the allowance thereof by the board of supervisors of the county.  In counties having two (2) judicial districts, such allowance shall be made in each judicial district; however, the maximum thereof shall not exceed Eight Hundred Dollars ($800.00).  Clerks in the circuit court, in cases where appeals are taken in criminal cases and no appeal bond is filed, shall be allowed by the board of supervisors of the county after approval of their accounts by the circuit court, in addition to the above fees, for making such transcript the rate of Two Dollars ($2.00) per page. (5)  The clerk of the circuit court may retain as his or her commission on all money coming into his or her hands, by law or order of the court, a sum to be fixed by the court not exceeding one-half of one percent (1/2 of 1%) on all such sums. (6)  For making final records required by law, including, but not limited to, circuit and county court minutes, and furnishing transcripts of records, the circuit clerk shall charge Two Dollars ($2.00) per page.  The same fees shall be allowed to all officers for making and certifying copies of records or papers which they are authorized to copy and certify. (7)  The circuit clerk shall prepare an itemized statement of fees for services performed, cost incurred, or for furnishing copies of any papers of record or on file, and shall submit the statement to the parties or, if represented, to their attorneys within sixty (60) days.  A bill for same shall accompany the statement. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.